src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
**LEXICON ACTPRFPRC_SG-nd/PL-nõd = 
Are the singular and plural homonyms?

**LEXICON ACTPRFPRC_SG-nd/PL-nnõd = 
Are the singular and plural homonyms?

**LEXICON PSSPRSPRC = 

**LEXICON PSSPRSPRC_b = 

**LEXICON PSSPRSPRC_tõb = 

**LEXICON PSSPRFPRCSG = 
2014-08-21

**LEXICON PSSPRFPRCSG_d = 
2014-08-21

**LEXICON PSSPRFPRCSG_tõd = 
2014-08-21

### Finites

**LEXICON INDPRS_tõ = Indicative present

**LEXICON INDPRS_mõ/tõ/bõd = Indicative present

**LEXICON INDPRS_m/t/bõd = Indicative present

**LEXICON INDPRT_ZERO = Indicative preterite in i

**LEXICON INDPRT_i = Indicative preterite in i

**LEXICON INDPRT_ita = Indicative preterite in i

**LEXICON INDPRT_z = Indicative preterite in z

**LEXICON INDPRT_ztõ = Indicative preterite in z

**LEXICON INDPRT_zt/ztõ = Indicative preterite in z

**LEXICON INDPRT_ž = Indicative preterite in ž

**LEXICON INDPRT_žtõ = Indicative preterite in ž

**LEXICON INDPRTSG3-STEM_tõ = 

**LEXICON COND = Conditional present

### Indicative present

**LEXICON INDPRSSG1-STEM = 
* INDPRSSG1 ; 
* INDPRSSG2 ; 
* INDPRSSG3 ; these three lexica point to lexica with the actual suffixes.

Conditional

Imperative

Jussative

Quotative

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-liv/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
